Colorado statutes. TITLE 23 Postsecondary Education
ARTICLE 64 PRIVATE OCCUPATIONAL SCHOOLS
23-64-131. Enforcement - injunction - fines - rules.

Whenever it appears to the board that any entity is or has been violating any of the provisions of this article 64 or any of the lawful rules or orders of the board, the board, on its own motion or on the written complaint of any person, may apply for and obtain a temporary restraining order or injunction, or both, in the name of the board in any district court in this state against the entity for the purpose of restraining or enjoining the violation or for an order directing compliance with the provisions of this article 64 and all rules and orders issued pursuant to this article 64. The board may also issue a cease-and-desist order prior to seeking court-ordered injunctive relief. It is not necessary that the board allege or prove that it has no adequate remedy at law. The right of injunction or a cease-and-desist order provided for in this section is in addition to any other legal remedy that the board has and is in addition to any right of criminal prosecution provided by law. The existence of board action with respect to alleged violations of this article 64 is not a bar to any action for injunctive relief pursuant to this section.

The board shall have the authority to promulgate rules and adopt procedures to establish, impose, and collect fines from an entity that is in violation of the provisions of this article 64 or the lawful rules or orders of the board. The board may impose a fine, pursuant to said rules, in addition to or in lieu of seeking a temporary restraining order or an injunction pursuant to subsection (1) of this section. All fines collected pursuant to this subsection (2) shall be transferred to the state treasurer, who shall credit the same to the state general fund.

In determining whether to impose a fine, seek a temporary restraining order or an injunction, or issue a cease-and-desist order, the board shall consider whether the entity has engaged in a pattern of noncompliance.

Source:

L. 2017:

Entire article added with relocations, (HB 17-1239), ch. 261, p. 1201, § 1, effective August 9.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 12-59-125 as it existed prior to 2017.

23-64-132. Transfer of governance of private occupational schools - provisions for transition - rules.

Any powers, duties, and functions relating to the governance, jurisdiction, and control of private occupational schools that were previously vested in the state board for community colleges and occupational education prior to July 1, 1990, are specifically transferred to the division on July 1, 1990.

The powers, duties, and functions specified in section 23-64-108 relating to the governance, jurisdiction, and control of private occupational schools that were previously vested in the division prior to July 1, 1998, are specifically transferred to the board on July 1, 1998.

The board shall establish minimum criteria, promulgate other rules, and adopt procedures necessary for the conduct of its work and the implementation of this article 64 pursuant to section 23-64-108.

Source:

L. 2017:

Entire article added with relocations, (HB 17-1239), ch. 261, p. 1202, § 1, effective August 9.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 12-59-127 as it existed prior to 2017.

23-64-133. Repeal of article - review of functions.

This article 64 is repealed, effective September 1, 2024. Prior to the repeal, the department of regulatory agencies shall review the regulation of private occupational schools and their agents under this article 64, including the functions of the division and the board, in accordance with section 24-34-104.

Source:

L. 2017:

Entire article added with relocations, (HB 17-1239), ch. 261, p. 1202, § 1, effective August 9.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 12-59-128 as it existed prior to 2017.